Massachusetts, session 194th, H494.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12 of chapter 156C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “dollars”, in line 42, the
following words:- ; provided, however, that the fee for the filing of a certificate of organization
for a micro business, as defined in subsection (a) of section 69 of chapter 23A, shall be $200.
SECTION 2. Said section 12 of said chapter 156C, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “dollars”, in line 44, the following words:- ; provided,
however, that the fee for the filing of the annual report for a micro business, as defined in said
subsection (a) of said section 69 of said chapter 23A, shall be $200.
of 1